Arkansas, session 2025, HB1223.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-7-305(c)(1)(B), concerning the form of
ballots and the use of a prefix to the name of a person who files for an
elective office, is amended to read as follows:
(B) A person may use as the prefix the title of a
nonpartisan judicial office in an election for a nonpartisan judicial office
only if:
(i) The person is currently serving in a nonpartisan
*JLL012*
12/02/2024 4:54:13 PM JLL012

HB1223
judicial office to which the person has been elected in the last election for
the office; or
(ii) The person:
(a) Is a candidate for the office of Justice
of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge, or
district judge;
(b) Is currently serving in the office of
Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, circuit judge,
or district judge as an appointee; and
(c) Has been serving in that position for at
least twelve (12) months.

























12/02/2024 4:54:13 PM